182 CHAPTER 7
New
Educational Opportunities for Women
the country. Many were frankly aristocratic in outlook, training their students to become members of the nation’s elite. There were a few schools open to the poor offering education that was clearly inferior to that provided at exclusive schools.
Private secondary schools such as those in New England, and even many public schools, accepted only male students. Yet the early nineteenth century did see some important advances in female education.
In the eighteenth century, women received very little education of any kind, and the female illiteracy rate at the time of the Revolution was very high-at least 50 percent. At the same time, however,
Americans had begun to place a new value on the contribution
of the "republican mother” to the training of the new generation. That raised an important question:
If mothers remained ignorant, how could they raise their children to be enlightened? Beginning as early as the 1770s and accelerating thereafter, such concerns led to the creation of a network of female
academies throughout the nation (usually for the daughters of affluent families). In 1789, Massachusetts required that its public schools serve females as well as males. Other states, although not all, soon followed.
Most white men, at least, assumed that female education should serve only to make women better wives and mothers. Women therefore had no need for advanced or professional training; there was no reason for colleges and universities to make space for female students. Some women, however, aspired to more. In 1784, Judith Sargent Murray published an essay defending women’s rights to education, a defense set in terms very different from those used by most men. Men and women were equal in intellect and potential, Murray argued. Women, therefore, should have precisely the same educational opportunities as men. Moreover, they should have opportunities to earn their own living, to establish a role for themselves in society apart from their husbands and families. Murray’s ideas became an inspiration to later generations of women, but during most of her own lifetime (1751-1820) they attracted little support.
Reformers who believed in the power of education to reform and redeem ignorant and "backward” people spurred a growing interest in Indian education. Because Jefferson and his followers liked to think of Native Americans as "noble savages” (uncivi-
Indian	lized but’ unlike their view of African
Education	Americans, not necessarily innately infe-
rior), they hoped that schooling the Indians in white culture would tame and “uplift” the tribes. Although white governments did little to promote Indian education, mis-
sionaries and mission schools proliferated among the tribes.
Almost no white people in the early nineteenth century believed that there was a need to educate African Americans, almost all of whom were still slaves. In a few northern states,
A SEMINARY FOR WOMEN
Educational opportunities for women were scarce in the early nineteenth century, but by the 1820s a number of seminaries were created for young ladies, mostly affluent students. The watercolor on silk is by an unknown artist and portrays two women studying geography. (© The Granger Collection, New York) some free black children attended segregated schools. In the South, slaveowners generally tried to prevent their black workers from learning to read or write, fearful that knowledge would make them unhappy with their condition. Some African Americans managed to acquire some education despite these obstacles, by teaching themselves and their own children. But the numbers of literate slaves remained very small.
Higher education was much less widely available than education at lower levels, despite Republican hopes for a Higher	wide dispersion of advanced knowledge.
Education (Jefferson founded the University of Virginia to promote that ideal.) The number of colleges and universities in America grew from nine at the start of the Revolution to twenty-two by 1800 and continued to increase thereafter. None of the new schools, however, was truly public. Even those established by state legislatures (in Georgia, North Carolina, Vermont, Ohio, and South Carolina, for example) relied on private contributions and on tuition fees. Scarcely more than one white man in a thousand (and no women, blacks, or Indians) had access to college education, and those few who did attend universities were almost without excep-
tion members of prosperous, propertied families.
The education that the colleges provided was exceedingly limited—narrow training in the classics and a few other areas and intensive work in theology. Indeed, the clergy was the only profession for which college training was generally a prerequisite. A few institutions attempted to provide their students advanced education in other fields. The College of William and Mary in Virginia, the University of Pennsylvania, and Columbia College in New York all created law schools before 1800, but most lawyers continued to train for their profession simply by apprenticing themselves to practicing attorneys.
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA
• 183 Medicine and Science
The University of Pennsylvania created the first American medical school in the eighteenth century. In the early nineteenth century, however, most doctors studied medicine by working with an established practitioner. Some American physicians believed in applying new scientific methods to medicine and struggled against age-old prejudices and superstitions. Efforts to teach anatomy, for example, encountered strong public hostility because of the dissection of cadavers that the study required. Municipal authorities had no understanding of medical science and almost no idea of what to do in the face of the severe epidemics that so often swept their populations; only slowly did they respond to the warnings of, among others, Benjamin Rush, a pioneering Philadelphia physician, that lack of adequate sanitation programs was to blame for disease.
Individual patients often had more to fear from their doctors than from their illnesses. Even the leading advocates of scientific medicine often embraced useless
B£RushIN aRd dangerous treatments. Benjamin Rush, for example, was an advocate of the new and supposedly scientific techniques of bleeding and purging, and many of his patients died. George Washington's death in 1799 was probably less a result of the minor throat infection that had afflicted him than of his physicians' efforts to cure
him by bleeding and purging.
The medical profession also used its newfound commitment to the "scientific” method to justify expanding its own role to kinds of care that had traditionally been outside its domain. Most childbirths, for example, had been attended by female midwives. In the early nineteenth century, physicians began to handle deliveries themselves and to demand restrictions on the
Decline of role of midwives. Among the results of that
Midwifery	change was a narrowing of opportunities for
women (midwifery was an important female occupation) and a restriction of access to childbirth care for poor mothers (who could have afforded midwives, but who
could not pay the higher physicians’ fees).
Education and professional training in the early republic-in medicine and in many other fields-thus fell far short of the Jeffersonian vision. Indeed, efforts to promote education and increase professionalism often had the effect of strengthening existing elites rather than eroding them.
Cultural Aspirations in the New Nation
Establishment of a National Culture
Many Americans in the Jeffersonian era may have repudiated the Federalist belief in political and economic centralization, but most embraced another form of nationalism with great fervor. Having won political independence from Europe, they aspired now to a form of cultural indepen-
dence. In the process, they dreamed of an American literary and artistic life that would rival the greatest achievements of Europe. As a popular "Poem on the Rising Glory of America” had predicted as early as 1772, Americans believed that their "happy land” was destined to become the "seat of empire” and the "final stage” of civilization, with "glorious works of high invention and of wond’rous art.” The United States, another eighteenth-century writer had proclaimed, would serve as "the last and greatest theatre for the improvement of mankind.”
Such nationalism found expression, among other places, in early American schoolbooks. The Massachusetts geographer
THE PENNSYLVANIA HOSPITAL
The ideas of the Enlightenment spread through American culture in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries and strengthened the belief that every individual was a divine being and could be redeemed from even the most miserable condition. Hospitals and asylums—such as this institution in Pennsylvania—began to emerge to provide settings for the redemption of the poor, the ill, and the deviant. (© Archive Photos/Getty Images] 184 . CHAPTER 7
Jedidiah Morse, author of Geography Made Easy (1784), said the country must have its own textbooks to prevent the aristocratic ideas of England from infecting the people. The Connecticut schoolmaster and lawyer Noah Webster argued similarly that American students should be educated as patriots, their minds filled with nationalistic, American thoughts.
To encourage a distinctive American culture and help unify the new nation, Webster insisted on a simplified and Americanized system of spelling-"honor” instead of "honour,” for example. His American Spelling Book, first published in 1783 and commonly known as the "blue-backed speller/’ eventually sold over 100 million copies, to become the
Noah Webster best selling book (except for the Bible) in the history of American publishing. In addition, his school dictionary, issued in 1806, was republished in many editions and was eventually enlarged to become (in
1828) An American Dictionary of the English Language. His speller and his dictionary established a national standard of words and usages.
Those Americans who aspired to create a more elevated national literary life faced a number of obstacles. There was a large potential audience for a national literature-a substantial reading public, created in part by the wide circulation of newspapers and political pamphlets during the Revolution. But there were few opportunities for would-be American authors to get their work before the public. Printers preferred to publish popular works by English writers (for which they had to pay no royalties); magazine publishers filled their pages largely with items clipped from British periodicals. Only those American writers willing to pay the cost and bear the risk of publishing their own works could compete for public attention.
Even so, a growing number of American authors struggled to create a strong native literature so that, as the poet Joel Barlow wrote, "true ideas of glory may be implanted in the minds of men here, to take the place of the false and destructive ones that have degraded the species in other countries.” Barlow himself, one of a group of Connecticut writers known as the "Hartford Wits,” published an epic poem, The Columbiad, in 1807, in an effort to convey the special character of American civilization. The acclaim it received helped to encourage other native writers.
Among the most ambitious was the Philadelphian Charles Brockden Brown. Like many Americans, he was attracted to the relatively new literary form of the novel, which had become popular in England in the late eighteenth century and had been successfully imported to America. But Brown sought to do more than simply imitate the English forms; he tried to use his novels to give voice to distinctively American themes, to convey the soaring passions and intellectual energy” of the new nation. His obsession with originality led him to produce a body of work characterized by a fascination with horror and deviant behavior. Perhaps as a result, his novels failed to develop a large popular following.
Much more successful was Washington Irving, a resident of New York State who won wide acclaim for his satirical
histories of early American life and his powerful fables of society in the New World. His popular
Washington	folktales, recounting the adventures of
Irving	sucj1 American rustics as Ichabod Crane
and Rip Van Winkle, made him the widely acknowledged leader of American literary life in his era and one of the few writers of that time whose works would continue to be read by later generations.
Perhaps the most influential works by American authors in the early republic were not poems, novels, or stories, but works of history that glorified the nation’s past. Mercy Otis Warren, who had been an influential playwright and agitator during the 1770s, continued her literary efforts with a three-volume History of the Revolution, published in 1805 and emphasizing the heroism of the American struggle. Mason Weems, an Anglican clergyman, published a eulogistic Life of Washington in 1806, which became one of the best-selling books of the era. Weems had little interest in historical accuracy. He portrayed the aristocratic former president as a homespun man possessing simple republican virtues. (He also invented, among other things, the famous story of Washington and the cherry tree.) History, like literature, was serving as a vehicle for instilling a sense of nationalism in the American people.
Religious Skepticism
The American Revolution weakened traditional forms of religious practice by detaching churches from government and by elevating ideas of individual liberty and reason. By the 1790s, only a small proportion of white Americans (perhaps as few as 10 percent) were members of formal churches, and ministers were complaining often about the "decay of vital piety.” Religious traditionalists were particularly alarmed about the emergence of new, "rational” theologies that reflected modern, scientific attitudes and de-emphasized the role of God in the world.
Some Americans, including Jefferson and Franklin, embraced "deism,” which had originated among Enlightenment philosophers in France. Deists accepted the existence of God, but considered God a remote being who, after having created the universe, had withdrawn from direct involvement with Deism	lhe human race and its sins. Books and arti-
cles attacking religious "superstitions” attracted wide readerships and provoked much discussion, among them Thomas Paine’s The Age of Reason, published in parts between 1794 and 1796. Paine once declared that Christianity was the "strangest religion ever set up,” for "it committed a murder upon Jesus in order to redeem mankind
from the sin of eating an apple.”
Religious skepticism also produced the philosophies of "universalism” and "unitarianism,” which emerged at first as dissenting views within the New England Congregational Church. Disciples of these new ideas rejected the Calvinist behef in predestination, arguing that salvation was available to all. They rejected, too, the idea of the Trinity. Jesus was
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA
• 185 only a great religious teacher, they claimed, not the Son of God. So wide was the gulf between these dissenters and the Congregationalist establishment that it finally became a permanent schism. James Murray (who later married Judith Sargent Murray) founded the Universalist Church as a separate denomination in Gloucester, Massachusetts, in 1779; the Unitarian Church was established in Boston three years later.
Some Americans believed that the spread of rationalism marked the end of traditional, evangelistic religion in the new nation. But quite the contrary was true. In fact, most Americans continued to hold strong religious beliefs. What had declined was their commitment to organized churches and denominations, which many considered too formal and traditional for their own zealous religious faith. Deism, Universalism, Unitarianism, and other ’’rational” religions seemed more powerful than they actually were because for a time traditional evangelicals were confused and disorganized. But beginning in 1801, traditional religion staged a dramatic comeback in the form of a wave of revivalism known as the Second Great Awakening.
The Second Great Awakening
The origins of the Second Great Awakening lay in the efforts of conservative theologians of the 1790s to fight the spread of religious rationalism, and to encourage church establishments to revitalize their organizations.
Leaders of several different denominations participated in the evangelizing efforts that drove the revival. Presbyterians tried to arouse the faithful on the western fringe of white settlement, and conservatives in the church denounced New Light dissenters (people who had altered their religious views to make them more compatible with the world of scientific rationalism). Methodism, which John Wesley had founded in England, spread to America in the 1770s and became a formal denomination in 1784 under the leadership of Francis Asbury. Authoritarian and hierarchical in structure, the Methodist Church sent itinerant preachers throughout the nation to win recruits; it soon became the fastest-growing denomination in America. Almost as successful were the Baptists, who were themselves relatively new to America; they found an especially fervent following in the South.
By 1800, the revivalist energies of all these denominations were combining to create the greatest surge of evangelical fervor since the first Great Awakening ane Ridge sixty years before Beginning among Presbyterians in several eastern colleges (most notably at Yale, under the leadership of President Timothy Dwight), the new awakening soon spread rapidly throughout the country, reaching its greatest heights in the western regions. In only a few years, a large proportion of the American people were mobilized by the movement, and membership in those churches embracing the revival-most prominently the Methodists, the Baptists, and the Presbyterians-was mushrooming. At Cane
Ridge, Kentucky, in the summer of 1801, a group of evangelical ministers presided over the nation’s first "camp meeting”-an extraordinary revival that lasted several days and impressed all who saw it with its size (some estimated that 25,000 people attended) and its fervor. Such events became common in subsequent years, as the Methodists in particular came to rely on them as a way to "harvest” new members. The Methodist circuit-riding preacher Peter Cartwright won national fame as he traveled from region to region exhorting his listeners to embrace the church. Even Cartwright, however, was often unprepared for the results of his efforts-a religious frenzy that at times produced convulsions, fits, rolling in the dirt, and twitching "holy jerks.”
The message of the Second Great Awakening was not entirely consistent, but its basic thrust was clear: individuals must readmit God and Christ into their daily lives, must embrace a fervent, active piety, and must reject the skeptical rationalism that threatened traditional beliefs. Even so, the wave of revivalism did not serve to restore the religious ideas of the past. Few of the revivalist denominations any longer accepted the idea of predestination; and the belief that a person could affect his or her own destiny added intensity to the individual’s search for salvation. The Awakening, in short, combined a more active piety with a belief in God as an active force in the world whose grace could be attained through faith and good works.
The Second Great Awakening also accelerated the growth of different sects and denominations. It helped create a broad popular acceptance of the idea that men and women could belong to different Protestant churches and still be committed to essentially the same Christian faith. Finally, the new evangelicalism-by
spreading religious fervor into every area of the nation-provided a vehicle for establishing a sense of order and social stability in communities still searching for an identity.
One of the most striking features of the Second Great Awakening was the preponderance of women (particularly young women) within it. One reason for this was that women were more numerous in certain regions than men. Adventurous young men often struck out on their own and moved west; women, for the most part, had no such options. Their marriage prospects thus diminished and their futures plagued with uncertainty, some women discovered in religion a foundation on which to build their lives. But even where there was no shortage of men, women flocked to the revivals in enormous numbers, which suggests that they were responding to their changing economic roles as well. The movement of industrial work out of the home (where women had often contributed to the family economy through spinning and weaving) and into the factory-a process making rapid strides in the early nineteenth century (see pp. 192-193)-deprived older women, in particular, of one of their most important social roles. Religious enthusiasm helped compensate for the losses and adjustments these transitions produced; it also provided access to a new range of activities
Message of the Second Great Awakening
Camp (or revival) meetings were popular among some evangelical Christians RELIGIOUS REVIVALS in America as early as 1800. By the 1820s, there were approximately 1,000 meetings a year, most of them in the South and West. Estimated attendance at some
of the larger meetings was as large as 25,000 people.
Today, there are many "megachurches” throughout the United States. Although
opinions vary on what constitutes a "megachurch,” the Hartford Institute on Religious Research lists these characteristics: (1) 2,000 or more persons in attendance at weekly worship; (2) a charismatic, authoritative senior minister; (3) a very active seven-day-a-week congregational community; (4) a multitude of social and outreach ministries; and (5) a complex differentiated organizational structure. By this definition, there are more than 1,200 megachurches in the United States, most of them located in Sunbelt states, especially California, Texas, Georgia, and Florida.
The two images that follow, the first a lithograph dated 1837 and the second a photograph of a modern megachurch, suggest both comparisons and contrasts between the two religious movements.
CAMP MEETINGS—1837
METHODIST CAMP MEETING, 1837.
The Granger Collection, New Yorkl religious revival
) or
unucksiand, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1 |tratiOnfreVea' ab°Ut tHe type °f pe°ple who attended , meetings? In what types of activities are the people of this image engaged-?
^"9 place? What does the setting P 9	d the ways in which they practiced their religion?
186
MEGACHURCHES-2010
MAKE CONNECTIONS
1.	How would you characterize this setting? How does it differ from the setting of the revival meeting illustrated in the 1837 lithograph? What does it have in common with that setting?
2.	List the various things that people are doing in this photograph. How does that differ from the activities portrayed in the 1837 lithograph?
3.	What do these images suggest about the connections between today s megachurches and the camp meetings of the Second Great Awakening?
187
188 . CHAPTER 7
African Americans and THE Revivals
associated with the churches-charitable societies ministering to orphans and the poor, missionary organizations, and others-in which women came to play important roles.
Although revivalism was most widespread within white society, it penetrated other cultures as well. In some areas of the country, revivals were open to people of all races, and many African Americans not only attended but eagerly embraced the new religious fervor as well. Out of these revivals, in fact, emerged a substan-
tial group of black preachers, who became important figures within the slave community. Some of them translated the apparently egalitarian religious message of the Second Great Awakening-that salvation was available to all-into a similarly egalitarian message for blacks in the present world. Out of black revival meetings in Virginia arose an elaborate plan in 1800 (devised by Gabriel Prosser, the brother of an African American preacher) for a slave rebellion and attack on Richmond. The plan was discovered and the rebellion forestalled by whites, but revivalism continued to stir racial unrest in the South.
The spirit of revivalism was also particularly strong in these years among Native Americans, although very different from revivalism in white or black society. It drew heavily from earlier tribal experiences. In the 1760s, the Delaware prophet Neolin had sparked a widespread revival in the Old Northwest with a message combining Christian and Indian imagery and bringing to Native American religion a vision of a personal God, intimately involved in the affairs of man. Neolin had also called for Indians to rise up in defense of their lands and had denounced the growth of trade and other relationships with white civilization. His vehement statements had helped stimulate the Indian military efforts of 1763 and beyond.
The dislocations and military defeats Indians suffered in the aftermath of the American Revolution created a sense of crisis among many of the eastern tribes in particular; as a result, the 1790s and early 1800s became another era of Indian religious fervor and prophecy. Presbyterian and Baptist missionaries were active among the south-
ern tribes and sparked a great wave of conversions. The most important revivalism came from the efforts of another great prophet: Handsome Lake, a Seneca whose seemingly miraculous "rebirth” after years of alcoholism helped give him a special stature within his tribe. Handsome Lake, like Neolin before him, called for a revival of traditional Indian ways. (He claimed to have met Jesus, who instructed him to 'Tell your people they will become lost when they follow the ways of the white man.”) Handsome Lake’s message spread through the scattered Iroquois communities and inspired many Indians to give up whiskey, gambling, and other destructive customs derived from white society.
But the revival did not, in fact, lead to a true restoration of traditional Iroquois culture. Instead, Handsome Lake encouraged Christian missionaries to become active within the tribes,
Indians and the Second Great Awakening
and he urged Iroquois men to abandon their roles as hunters (partly because so much of their hunting land had been seized by whites) and become sedentary farmers instead. Iroquois women, who had traditionally done the farming, were to move into more-domestic roles. When some women resisted the change, Handsome Lake denounced them as witches. He demanded confessions from them and killed some of those who refused.
The Second Great Awakening also had important effects on those Americans who did not accept its teachings. The rational "freethinkers,” whose skeptical philosophies freethinkers	helped produce the revivals, were in
many ways victims of the new religious fervor. They did not disappear after 1800, but their influence rapidly declined, and for many years they remained a small and defensive minority within American Christianity. Instead, the dominant religious characteristic of the new nation became a fervent evangelicalism, which would survive into the mid-nineteenth century
and beyond.
STIRRINGS OF
INDUSTRIALISM
Despite the hopes of Jefferson and his followers that the United States would remain a simple agrarian republic, the nation took its first, tentative steps in these years toward its transformation into an urban, industrial society.
Technology in America
Americans imported some of these technological advances from England. (See "America in the World,” pp. 192 193.) The British government attempted to protect the nation’s manufacturing preeminence by preventing the export of textile machinery or the emigration of skilled mechanics. Despite such efforts, immigrants arrived in the United States with advanced knowledge of English technology, eager to introduce the new machines to America. Samuel Slater, for example, used the knowledge he had acquired before leaving England to build a spinning mill for the Quaker merchant Moses Brown in Pawtucket, Rhode Island, in 1790. It was the first modern factory in America.
America in the early nineteenth century also produced several important inventors of its own. Among them was Oliver Evans of Delaware, who devised a number of ingenious new machines: an automated flour mill, a card-making machine, and others. He made several important improvements in the steam engine, and in 1795 he published Americas first textbook of mechanical engineering: The Young Mill-Wright’s and Miller’s Guide. His own Hour milt which began operations in 1787, required only two men to operate: one of them emptying a bag of wheat into the ma-
c inery, another putting the lid on the barrels of flour and rolling them away.
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA - 189
THE COTTON GIN
Eli Whitney’s cotton gin revolutionized the cotton economy of the South by making the processing of short-staple cotton simple and economical. With the device, a single operator could clean as much cotton in a few hours as a group of workers had once needed a whole day to do. (Private Collection/© J. T. Vintage/The Bridgeman Art Library) Even more influential for the future of the nation were the inventions of the Massachusetts-born, Yale-educated Eli Whitney, who revolutionized both cotton production and weapons manufacturing. The growth of the textile industry in England had created an enormous demand for cotton, a demand that planters in the American South were finding impossible to meet. Their greatest obstacle was separating the seeds from cotton fiber-a difficult and time-consuming process that was essential before cotton could be sold. Long-staple, or Sea Island, cotton, with its smooth black seeds and long fibers, was easy to clean, but it grew successfully only along the Atlantic coast or on the offshore islands of Georgia and South Carolina. There was not nearly enough of it to satisfy the demand. Short-staple cotton, by contrast, could grow inland through vast areas of the South. But its sticky green seeds were extremely difficult to remove. A skilled worker could clean no more than a few pounds a day by hand. Then, in 1793, Whitney, who was working at the time as a tutor on r,	,	the Georgia plantation of General Nathanael
Cotton Gin Greene’s widow, invented a machine that performed the arduous task quickly and efficiently. It was dubbed the cotton gin Cgin” was an abbrevia-
tion for "engine”), and it transformed the life of the South.
Mechanically, the gin was very simple. A toothed roller caught the fibers of the cotton boll and pulled them between the wires of a grating. The grating caught the seeds while a revolving brush removed the lint from the roller’s teeth. With the device, a single operator could clean as much cotton in a few hours as a group of workers had once needed a whole day to do. The results were profound. Soon cotton growing spread into the upland South and beyond, and within a decade total crop production increased eightfold. African American slavery, which with the decline of tobacco production some had considered a dwindling institution,
The Cotton Gin’s Impact on the North
regained its importance, expanded, and became more firmly fixed upon the South.
The cotton gin not only changed the economy of the South, it also helped transform the North. The large supply of domestically produced fiber was a strong incentive to entrepreneurs in New England and elsewhere to develop an American textile industry. Few northern states could
hope to thrive on the basis of agriculture alone; by learning to turn cotton into yarn and thread, plantation owners could become industrially prosperous instead. The manufacturing preeminence of the North, which emerged with the development of the textile industry in the 1820s and 1830s, helped drive a wedge between the nation’s two most populous regions-one becoming increasingly industrial, the other more firmly bound to agriculture.
Whitney also made a major contribution to the development of modern warfare and in the process made a contribution to other industrial techniques. During the two years of undeclared war with France (1798 and 1799), Americans were deeply troubled by their lack of sufficient armaments for the expected hostilities. Production of muskets-each carefully handcrafted by a skilled gunsmith-was discouragingly slow. Whitney devised a machine to make each part of a gun according to an exact pattern. Tasks could thus be divided among several workers, and one laborer could quickly assemble a weapon out of parts made by several others. Before long, manufacturers of sewing machines, clocks, and many other complicated products were using the same system.
The new technological advances were relatively isolated phenomena during the early years of the nineteenth century. Not until at least the 1840s did the nation begin to develop a true manufacturing economy. But the inventions of this period were crucial in making the eventual transformation possible.
Transportation Innovations
One of the prerequisites for industrialization is an efficient system for transporting raw materials to factories and finished goods to markets. The United States had no such system in the early years of the republic. But work was under way that would ultimately remove the transportation obstacle.
There were several ways to solve the problem of the small
American market. One was to look for customers overseas, and
American merchants continued their efforts to do that. Among
the first acts of the new Congress when it met in 1789 were
two tariff bills giving preference to American ships in American
ports, helping to stimulate an expansion of domestic shipping.
More important-indeed the principal reason for the growth
of American trade in this period-was the outbreak of war
in Europe in the 1790s, allowing Yankee merchant vessels
to take over most of the carrying trade Rapid Growth	,	_	,	,
of American	between	Europe	and	the	Western
Shipping Hemisphere. As early as 1793, the young republic had a merchant marine and a
190 • CHAPTER 7
PAWTUCKET BRIDGE AND FALLS
One reason for the growth of the textile industry in New England in the early nineteenth century was that there were many sources of water power in the region to run the machinery in the factories. That was certainly the case with Slater’s Mill, one of the first American textile factories. It was located in Pawtucket, Rhode Island, alongside a powerful waterfall, demonstrating the critical importance of water power to early American industry. (© Bettmann/Corbis) foreign trade larger than those of any country except England. In proportion to its population, the United States had more ships and international commerce than any other country. Between 1789 and 1810, the total tonnage of American vessels engaged in overseas traffic rose from less than 125,000 to nearly 1 million. American ships had carried only 30 percent of the country’s exports in 1789; they were carrying over 90 percent in 1810. The figures for American ships carrying imports increased even more dramatically, from 17.5 percent to 90 percent in the same period.
Another solution to the problem of limited markets was to develop new markets at home, by improving transportation between the states and into the interior of the continent. In river transportation, a new era began with the development of the steamboat. A number of inventors began experimenting with steam-powered craft in the late eighteenth century; John Fitch exhibited a forty-five-foot vessel with paddles operated by steam to some of the delegates at the Constitutional Convention in 1787. But the real breakthrough was Oliver Evans’s development of a high-pressure engine, lighter and more efficient than James Watt’s, which made steam more feasible for powering boats (and, eventually, locomotives) as well as mill machinery.
The inventor Robert Fulton and the promoter Robert R. Livingston were principally responsible for perfecting the steamboat and bringing it to the attention of the nation. Their Clermont, equipped with paddle wheels and an English-built engine, sailed up the Hudson in the summer of 1807, demonstrating the practicability of steam navigation (even though it took the ship thirty hours to go 150 miles).
In 1811, a partner of Livingston’s, Nicholas J. Roosevelt (a remote ancestor of Theodore Roosevelt), introduced the steamboat to the West by sending the New Orleans from Pittsburgh down the Ohio and Mississippi. The next year, this vessel began a profitable career of service between New Orleans and Natchez.
Robert
Fulton’s
Steamboat
Meanwhile, what was to become known as the "turnpike The Turnpike era” had begun. In 1792, a corporation Era	constructed a toll road running the sixty
miles from Philadelphia to Lancaster,
Pennsylvania, with a hard-packed surface of crushed rock. This venture proved so successful that several other companies laid out similar turnpikes (so named from the kind of tollgate frequently used) from other cities to neighboring towns. Since the turnpikes had to produce profits for the companies that
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA
191
AMERICAN STAGE WAGGON
This image of a stagecoach, by J. Stoner, shows how roads were beginning to link the disparate regions of early-nineteenth-century America. (© Corbisj
built them, construction costs had to be low enough and the prospective traffic heavy enough to ensure an early and ample return. As a result, these roads, radiating from eastern cities, ran comparatively short distances and through densely settled areas. No private operators were willing to build similar highways over the mountains and into the less populated interior. State governments and the federal government eventually had to finance them.
The Rising Cities
Despite all the changes and all the advances, America in the early nineteenth century remained an overwhelmingly rura and agrarian nation. Only 3 percent of the non-Indian popu a tion lived in towns of more than 8,000 at the time of t e sec ond census, in 1800. Ten percent lived west of the Appa ac ian Mountains, far from what urban centers there were. Muc the country remained a wilderness. Even the nations argest
cities could not begin to compare, either in size or in cultural sophistication, with such European capitals as London and Paris.
Yet here too there were signs of change. The leading American cities might not yet have become world capitals, but they were large and complex enough to rival the important secondary cities of Europe. Philadelphia, with 70,000 residents, and New York, with 60,000, were becoming major centers of commerce and learning. The cities were aiso developing a distinctively urban culture. So too were the next-largest cities of the new nation: Baltimore (26,000 in 1800), Boston (24,000), and Charleston (20,000).
People living in towns and cities lived differently than the vast majority of Americans who continued to work as farmers. Among other things, urban life produced
Urban Life affluencCj and affluent people sought amenities that would not have entered the imaginings of any but
,1?
AMERICA IN THE WORLD
The Global Industrial Revolution
i tentative stirrings of industrial activity in the United States in the early nineteenth cen-I tury were part of a vast movement that over the course of the century transformed much of the globe. Historians differ over precisely when the industrial revolution began, but it is clear that by the end of the eighteenth century it was well under way in many parts of the world. By the beginning of the twentieth century, industrialization had transformed the societies of Britain, most of continental Europe, Japan, and the United States.
For Americans, the industrial revolution was largely a result of the rapid changes in Great Britain, the nation with which they had the closest relations. Britain was the first nation to develop significant industrial capacity. The factory system took root in England in the late eighteenth century, revolutionizing the manufacture of cotton thread and cloth. One invention followed another in quick succession. Improvements in weaving drove improvements in spinning, and these changes created a demand for new devices for carding (combing and straightening the fibers for the spinner). Water,
THE ENGLISH CANAL AGE
Industrialization in England contributed, as it did in America, to the building of new transportation facilities to serve the growing commercial markets of the new economy. Among the most popular such facilities were canals, among them the Regent’s Canal in London, pictured here in the 1820s. (© Guildhall Library, Corporation of London, UK/The Bridgeman Art Library) wind, and animal power continued to be important in the textile industry; but more important was the emergence of steam power—which proliferated after the appearance of James Watt's advanced steam engine (patented in 1769). England's textile industry quickly became the most profitable in the world, and it helped encourage comparable advances in other fields of manufacturing as well. Despite the efforts of the British government to prevent the export of English industrial technology, knowledge of the new machines reached other nations quickly, usually through the emigration of people who had learned the technology in British factories.
America benefited the most from English technology, because it received more immigrants from Great Britain than from any other country. But English technology spread quickly to the nations of continental Europe as well. In Japan, the sudden intrusion of American and European traders helped cause the so-called Meiji reforms of the 1880s and 1890s, which launched a period of rapid industrialization there.
Industrialization changed not just the world's economies, but also its societies. First in England, and then in Europe, America, and Japan, social systems underwent wrenching changes. Hundreds of thousands, and eventually millions, of men and women moved from rural areas into cities to work in factories, where they experienced both the benefits and the costs of industrialization, Many of those who moved from farm to factory experienced some improvement in nutrition and other material circumstances, even in their health. But there were psychological costs to being suddenly uprooted from one way of life and thrust into another, fundamentally different one. Little in most workers’ prior experience had prepared them for the nature of industrial labor, The routinized, rigidly scheduled work of the urban factory contrasted sharply with the varying, seasonal work pattern of the rural economy. Industrial workers experienced, too, a fundamental change in their relationship
the wealthiest farmers. They sought increasing elegance and refinement in their homes, their grounds, and their dress. They also looked for diversions-music, theater, dancing, and, for many people, one of the most popular entertainments of all, horse racing. (See "Patterns of Popular Culture/’ pp. 196-197.)
Much remained to be done before this small and still half-formed nation would become a complex modern society. It was still possible in the early nineteenth century to believe that those changes might not ever occur. But forces were
already at work that, in time, would lastingly transform the United States.
JEFFERSON THE PRESIDENT
Privately, Thomas Jefferson may well have considered his victory over John Adams in 1800 to be what he later termed it. a revolution "as real ... as that of 1776.” Publicly, however,
192
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA . 193
with their employers. Unlike rural landlords and local aristocrats, factory owners and managers—the new class of industrial capitalists, many of them accumulating unprecedented wealth—were usually remote and inaccessible. They dealt with their workers impersonally, and the result was a growing schism between the two classes—each lacking access to or understanding of the other. Working men and women throughout the globe began thinking of themselves as a distinct class, with common goals and interests. Their efforts simultaneously to adjust to their new way of life and to resist its most damaging aspects sometimes created great social turbulence. Battles between workers and employers became a characteristic feature of industrial life throughout the world.
Life in industrial nations changed at every level. Populations in industrial countries grew rapidly, and people began to live longer. At the same time, industrial cities began to produce great increases in pollution, crime, and—until modern sanitation systems emerged—infectious disease. Around the industrial world, middle classes expanded and came to dominate the economy (although not always the culture or the politics) of their nations.
Not since the agricultural revolution thousands of years earlier, when many humans had turned from hunting to farming for sustenance, had there been an economic change of a magnitude comparable to that of the industrial revolution. Centuries of traditions, social patterns, and cultural and religious assumptions were challenged and often shattered. The social and economic consequences of industrialism were complex and profound, and they continue today to shape the nature of global society. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	Why did the British government attempt to prevent the export of Britain’s industrial technology?
2.	Was the industrial revolution truly a global revolution? Why or why not?
3.	Some observers have compared the information technology developments of the late twentieth century to those of the industrial revolution. Are the changes that have resulted from the high-tech developments of the late twentieth century as profound as those resulting from the industrial revolution?
In what way might the high-tech advances be considered a "revolution"? What have been the social and economic consequences of these advances?
ie was restrained and conciliatory as he assumed office, attempting to minimize the differences between the two parties md to calm the passions that the bitter campaign had aroused. We are all republicans, we are all federalists/' he said in his naugural address. And during his eight years in office, he did nuch to prove those words correct. There was no complete 'epudiation of Federalist policies, no true "revolution. Indeed, it times Jefferson seemed to outdo the Federalists at their own work-most notably in overseeing a remarkable expansion of -he territory of the United States.
The Federal City and the
"People's President'
The newly founded national capital was the city of Washington. The French architect Pierre L’Enfant had designed the capital
The N	°n a £rand sca^e^ with broad avenues radi-
Capital City atlng out from the uncomPleted Capitol building, set on one of the area's highest hills. Washington was, many Americans believed, to become
the Paris of the United States.
In reality, however, throughout Jefferson’s presidency-and indeed through most of the nineteenth century-Washington remained little more than a provincial village. Although the population increased steadily from the 3,200 counted in the 1800 census, it never rivaled that of New York, Philadelphia, or the other major cities of the nation. The city remained a raw, inhospitable community with few public buildings of any consequence. Members of Congress viewed Washington not as a home but as a place to visit briefly during sessions of the legislature and leave as quickly as possible. Most lived in a cluster of simple boardinghouses in the vicinity of the Capitol. It was not unusual for a member of Congress to resign his seat in the midst of a session to return home if he had an opportunity to accept the more prestigious post of member of his state legislature.
Jefferson set out as president to act in a spirit of democratic simplicity in keeping with the frontierlike character of the unfinished federal city. He was a wealthy and aristocratic planter by background, the owner of more than 100 slaves, and a man of rare cultivation and sophistication; but he conveyed to the public an image of plain, almost crude disdain for pretension. He walked like an ordinary citizen to and from his inauguration at the Capitol. In the presidential mansion, which had not yet acquired the name "White House,” he disregarded the courtly etiquette of his predecessors (in part, no doubt, because as a widower he had no First Lady to take charge of social affairs). At state dinners, he let his guests scramble pell-mell for places at the table. He did not always bother to dress up, once prompting the fastidious British ambassador to complain of being received by the president in coat and pantaloons that were "indicative of utter slovenliness and indifference to appearances.”
Yet Jefferson managed nevertheless to impress most of those who knew him. He was a brilliant conversationalist, a gifted writer, and one of the nation’s most intelligent and creative men, with perhaps a wider range of interests and accomplishments than any public figure in American history. In addition to politics and diplomacy, he was an active architect, educator, inventor, scientific farmer, and philosopher-scientist.
Jefferson was, above all, a shrewd and practical politician. On the one hand, he went to great lengths to eliminate the aura of majesty surrounding the presi-
7 Politician dency that he believed his predecessors had created. At the same time, however,
Jefferson worked hard to exert influence as the leader of his
194
CHAPTER 7
few Bern (1710) Wilmington (1730)
\ 1 I \ \ I I ( ^Charleston (H I 1 \ 'Savannah (1733)
NORTH AMERICA IN 1800
This map illustrates how substantially the non-Indian settlement of British North America (much of it by 1800 the United States) had expanded since 1700. On p. 67, a similar map shows a tiny fringe of settlement along the Atlantic seaboard. Note the new areas of settlement here: west of the original thirteen colonies—including, in Kentucky, an area that reaches almost to the Mississippi River. Significant settlements are also now visible along the Gulf Coast, especially in the territory around New Orleans. Scattered non-Indian settlements are visible in the Southwest and along the coast of California, as well as in southern Canada (where the settlements were largely forts). How does this map help explain the spread of settlement south from Pittsburgh into western Virginia and Kentucky?
1/2
1 km
WASHINGTON, D.C., IN THE EARLY NINETEENTH CENTURY
The nation’s capital moved from New York City to Washington, D.C., in 1800, into a new city designed on a grand scale by the French planner Pierre L'Enfant. But in the early eighteenth century, it remained little more than a village on a marshy tract of land, with hot, humid summers. This map shows the location of the principal government buildings in the early republic, and also the sites of the homes of members of the executive and legislative branches. Note how the homes of executive officials mostly clustered around the White House and the Treasury, while those of legislators mainly clustered around the Capitol. * How did the geography of the city help shape the relationship between the executive and legislative branches?
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA * 195
party, giving direction to Republicans in Congress by quiet and sometimes even devious means. Although the Republicans had objected strenuously to the efforts of their Federalist predecessors to build a network of influence through patronage, Jefferson, too, used his powers of appointment as an effective political weapon. By the end of his first term about half the government jobs, and by the end of his second term practically all of them, were in the hands of loyal Republicans.
When Jefferson ran for reelection in 1804, he won overwhelmingly. The Federalist presidential nominee, Charles C. Pinckney, could not even carry most of the party’s New England strongholds. Jefferson won 162 electoral votes to Pinckney’s 14, and the Republican majorities in both houses of Congress increased.
to treaties providing for annual tribute to the Barbary states, but Jefferson was reluctant to continue this policy of appeasement. "Tribute or war is the usual alternative of these Barbary pirates,” he said. "Why not build a navy and decide on war?”
In 1801, the pasha (leader) of Tripoli forced Jefferson’s hand. Unsatisfied by the American response to his extortionate demands, he ordered the flagpole of the American consulate chopped down-a symbolic declaration of war. Jefferson responded cautiously, building up the American fleet in the region over the next several years. Finally, in 1805, the United States reached an agreement with the pasha that ended American payments of tribute to Tripoli but required the United States to pay a substantial (and humiliating) ransom of $60,000 for the release of American prisoners seized by Barbary pirates.
Dollars and Ships
Conflict with the Courts
Under Washington and Adams, the Republicans believed, the government had been needlessly extravagant. Yearly federal expenditures had almost tripled between 1793 and 1800. Hamilton had, as he had intended, increased the public debt and created an extensive system of internal taxation, including the hated whiskey excise tax.
The Jefferson administration moved deliberately to reverse
the trend. In 1802, it persuaded Congress to abolish all internal
,	taxes, leaving customs duties and the sale
Limiting the c	°	r
Federal °* western lands as the only sources of rev-
Government enue for the government. Meanwhile, Secretary of the Treasury Albert Gallatin drastically reduced government spending, cutting the already small staffs of the executive departments to minuscule levels. Although Jefferson was unable to retire the entire national debt, as he had hoped, he did cut it almost in half (from
$83 million to $45 million) during his presidency.
Jefferson also scaled down the armed forces. He reduced
the army of 4,000 men to 2,500. He cut the navy from twenty-five ships to seven and reduced the number of officers and sailors accordingly. Anything but the smallest of standing armies, he argued, might menace civil liberties and civilian control of government. And a large navy, he feared, might promote overseas commerce, which Jefferson believed should remain secondary to agriculture. Yet Jefferson was not a pacifist. At the same time that he was reducing the size of the army and navy, he was helping to establish the United States Military Academy at West Point, founded in 1802. And when trouble began brewing overseas, he began again to build up the fleet.
Such trouble appeared first in the Mediterranean, off the coast of northern Africa. For years the Barbary states of North Africa-Morocco, Algiers, Tunis, and Tripoli (now part of Libya)-had been demanding protection money from all na-r	tions whose ships sailed the Mediterranean.
fXZv Even Great Britain gave regUlar COntribU' Pirates tions t0 the Barbary pirates. During the 1780s and 1790s the United States agreed
Having won control of the executive and legislative branches of government, the Republicans looked with suspicion on the judiciary, which remained largely in the hands of Federalist judges. Soon after Jefferson’s first inauguration, his followers in Congress launched an attack on this last preserve of the opposition. Their first step was the repeal of the Judiciary Act of 1801, thus eliminating the judgeships to which Adams had made his "midnight appointments.”
The debate over the courts led to one of the most important judicial decisions in the history of the nation. Federalists had long maintained that the Supreme
Review Court had the authority to nullify acts of Congress (although the Constitution said nothing specifically to support the claim), and the Court itself had actually exercised the power of judicial review in 1796 when it upheld the validity of a law passed by the legislature. But the Court’s authority in this area would not be secure, it was clear, until it actually declared a congressio-
nal act unconstitutional.
In 1803, in the case of Marbury v. Madison, it did so. William Marbury, one of Adams’s "midnight appointments,” had been named a justice of the peace in the District of Columbia. But __	his commission, although signed and
Madison sealed, had not been delivered to him before Adams left office. Once Jefferson became president, the new secretary of state, James Madison, was responsible for transmitting appointments. He had refused to hand over the commission to Marbury. Marbury appealed to the Supreme Court for an order directing Madison to perform his official duty. In its historic ruling, the Court found that Marbury had a right to his commission but that the Court had no authority to order Madison to deliver it. On the surface, therefore, the decision was a victory for the administration. But of much greater importance than the relatively insignificant matter of Marbury’s commission was the Court’s reason-
ing in the decision.
The original Judiciary Act of 1789 had given the Court the power to compel executive officials to act in such matters as
Horse Racing in Early America
1 r *'	T> it If It 1 horse racing began in North America almost as soon as
J3* U O AVI A
JLji Europeans settled the English colonies. Formal racing followed quickly. The first race track in North America—New Market (named for a popular race course in England)—was established in 1665 near the site of present-day Garden City, on Long Island in New York. Tracks quickly developed wide appeal, and soon horse racing had spread up and down the Atlantic coast. By the time of the American Revolution, it had become popular in almost every colony OAKLAND HOUSE AND RACE COURSE
This 1840 painting by Robert Brammer and August A. Von Smith portrays men and women flocking to an early race course in Louisville, Kentucky, which provided entertainment to affluent white southerners. {Oakland House and Race Course, Louisville, 1840. By Robert Brammer and August A. Von Smith. © Collection of The Speed Art Museum, Louisville, Kentucky. Purchase, Museum Art fund, S6.19) and was moving as well into the newly settled areas of the Southwest. Andrew Jackson was a founder of the first racing track in Nashville, Tennessee, in the early nineteenth century. Kentucky—whose native bluegrass was early recognized as ideal for grazing horses—had eight tracks by 1800.
Like almost everything else in the life of early America, the world of horse racing was bounded by lines of class and race. For many years, it was considered the exclusive preserve of "gentlemen," so much so that in 1674 a court in Virginia fined James Bullocke, a tailor, for proposing a race, "it being contrary to Law for a Labourer to make a race, being a sport only for Gentlemen." But while white aristocrats retained control of racing, they were not the only people who participated in it. Southern aristocrats often trained young male slaves as jockeys for their horses, just as northern horse owners employed the services of free blacks as riders. In the North and the South, African Americans eventually emerged as some of the most talented and experienced trainers of racing horses. And despite social and legal pressures, free blacks and poor whites often staged their own informal races.
Racing also began early to reflect the growing sectional rivalry between the North and the South. In 1824, the Union Race Course on Long Island established an astounding $24,000 purse for a race between two famous thoroughbreds: American Eclipse (from the North)

the delivery of commissions, and it was on that basis that Marbury had filed his suit. But the Court ruled that Congress had exceeded its authority in creating that statute: that the Constitution had defined the powers of the judiciary and that the legislature had no right to expand them. The relevant section of the 1789 act was therefore void. In seeming to deny its own authority, the Court was in fact radically enlarging it. The justices had repudiated a relatively minor power (the power to force the delivery of a commission) by asserting a vastly greater one (the power to nullify an act of Congress).
The chief justice of the United States at the time of the ruling was John Marshall, one of the towering figures in the history of American law. A leading Federalist and prominent Virginia lawyer, he had served John Adams as secretary of state. (It had been Marshall, ironically, who had neglected to deliver Marbury's commission in the closing hours of the administration.) In 1801, just before leaving office, Adams had appointed him chief justice, and almost immediately Marshall established himself as the dominant figure on the Court,
John	shaping all its most important rulings-
Marshall including, of course, Marbury v. Madison.
Through a succession of Republican administrations, he established the judiciary as a branch of government coequal with the executive and the legislature a position that the founders of the republic had never clearly
indicated it should occupy.
Jefferson recognized the threat that an assertive judiciary could pose to his policies. Even while the Marbury case was
Impeachment sti11 Pendin8, he was preparing for a re-of Samuel	newed assault on this last Federalist strong-
Chase	hold. He urged Congress to impeach
obstructive judges, and Congress attempted to oblige him. The Republicans successfully removed from office a district judge, John Pickering of New Hampshire (on the perhaps specious grounds that he was insane and thus unfit for office). They later targeted a justice of the Supreme Court itself: Justice Samuel Chase, a highly partisan Federalist. Chase had certainly been injudicious; he had, for example, delivered
16 .
THE ECLIPSE-HENRY MATCH RACE
Match races between famous horses were a popular feature of early-nineteenth-century horse racing. This famous 1823 race on Long Island, New York, pitted prize-winning horses from the North and the South against one another. American Eclipse, the northern entry, won. (Private Collection) and Sir Henry (from the South). American Eclipse won two of the three heats, but a southern racehorse prevailed in another such celebrated contest in 1836. These intersectional races, which drew enormous crowds and created tremendous publicity, continued into the 1850s, until the North-South rivalry began to take a deadly form.
Horse racing remained popular after the Civil War, but two developments changed its character considerably. One was the successful effort to drive African Americans out of the sport. At least until the 1890s, black jockeys and trainers remained central to racing. At the first Kentucky Derby, in 1875, fourteen of the fifteen horses had African American riders. One black man, Isaac Murphy, won a remarkable 44 percent of all races in which he rode, including three Kentucky Derbys. Gradually, however, the same social dynamics that enforced racial segregation in so many other areas of American life penetrated racing as well. By the beginning of the twentieth century, white jockeys and organized jockey clubs had driven almost all black riders and many black trainers out of the sport,
The second change was the introduction of formalized betting to the sport. In the late nineteenth century, race tracks began creating betting systems to lure customers to the races. At the same time that the breeding of racehorses was moving into the hands of enormously wealthy families, the audience for racing was becoming increasingly working class and lower middle class. The people who now came to tracks were mostly white men, and some white women, lured to the races not by a love
of horses—which were coming to play a less central role in their everyday lives—but by the usually futile hope of quick and easy riches through gambling. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	Why do you think horse racing was such a popular spectator sport in early America? Why has it continued to be popular?
2.	How did changes in the sport of horse racing reflect similar changes in American society?
3.	Is horse racing still a sport "bounded by lines of class and race"? What other spectator sports were or are similarly bounded?
stridently partisan speeches from the bench. But he had committed no crime. Some Republicans argued, however, that impeachment was not merely a criminal proceeding. Congress could properly impeach a judge for political reasons—for obstructing the other branches of the government and disregarding the will of the people.
At Jefferson’s urging, the House impeached Chase and sent him to trial before the Senate early in 1805. But Republican leaders were unable to get the necessary two-thirds vote for conviction in the Senate. Chase’s acquittal helped establish that impeachment would not become a routine political weapon, that something more than partisan disagreement should have to underlie the process, a precedent that Congress only occasionally violated in future years. Marshall remained secure in his position as chief justice. And the judiciary survived as a powerful force within the government-more often than not ruling on behalf of the centralizing, expansionary policies that the Republicans had hoped to reverse.
DOUBLING THE NATIONAL
DOMAIN
In the same year that Jefferson became president of the United States, Napoleon Bonaparte made himself ruler of France with the title of first consul. In the year that Jefferson was reelected, Napoleon named himself emperor. The two men had little in common. Yet for a time they were of great help to each other in international politics-until Napoleon’s ambitions moved from Europe to America and created conflict and estrangement.
Jefferson and Napoleon
Having failed in a grandiose plan to seize India from the British Empire, Napoleon turned his imperial ambitions in a new direction: he began to dream of restoring French power in the New World. The territory east of the Mississippi, which France
197
198 * CHAPTER 7
THOMAS JEFFERSON
This 1805 portrait by the noted American painter Rembrandt Peale shows Jefferson at the beginning of his second term as president. It also conveys (through the simplicity of dress and the slightly unkempt hair) the image of democratic simplicity that Jefferson liked to project. (© Collection of the New-York Historical Society, USA / The Bridgeman Art Library) JEFFERSON THE ARCHITECT
Among his many accomplishments, Thomas Jefferson was a gifted architect. This rotunda is the centerpiece of the central campus of the University of Virginia, which Jefferson designed near the end of his life. Earlier, he designed his own home near Charlottesville, Monticello; and his proposal for a president's mansion in Washington, D.C., placed second in a blind competition. (© The Granger Collection, New York. ) had ceded to Great Britain in 1763, was now mostly part of the United States and lost to France forever. But Napoleon wanted to regain the lands west of the Mississippi, which now belonged to Spain, over which Napoleon now exercised strong influence. Under the secret Treaty of San Udefonso of 1800 between the French and the Spanish, France regained title to Louisiana, which included almost the whole of the Mississippi Valley to the west of the river, plus New Orleans near its mouth. The Louisiana Territory would, Napoleon hoped, become the heart of a great French empire in America.
Also part of Napoleon's empire in the New World were the sugar-rich and strategically valuable West Indian islands that still belonged to France-Guadeloupe, Martinique, and above all Santo Domingo. But unrest among the Caribbean slaves posed a threat to Napoleon’s hopes for the islands. Africans in Santo Domingo (inspired by the French Revolution) revolted and created a republic of their own, under the re-
Toussaint	markable black leader Toussaint L’Ouverture.
L’Ouverture
Taking advantage of a truce in his war with England, Napoleon sent an army to the West Indies. It temporarily crushed the insurrection and restored French authority; but the incident was an early sign of the problems Napoleon would have in realizing his ambitions in America.
Jefferson was unaware at first of Napoleon’s imperial ambitions in America, and for a time he pursued a foreign policy that reflected his well-known admiration for France. He appointed as American minister to Paris the ardently pro-French Robert R. Livingston. He worked to secure ratification of the Franco-American settlement of 1800 and began observing the terms of the treaty even before it was ratified. The Adams administration had joined with the British in recognizing and supporting the rebel regime of Toussaint L’Ouverture in Santo Domingo; Jefferson assured the French minister in Washington that the American people, especially those of the slaveholding states, did not approve of the black revolutionary, who they thought was setting a bad example for their own slaves. He even implied that the United States might join with France in putting down the rebellion (although nothing ever came of the suggestion). Jefferson began to reconsider his position toward France, however, when he heard rumors of the secret transfer of Louisiana.
Jefferson was even more alarmed when, in the fall of 1802, he learned that the Spanish intendant at New Orleans (who still governed the city, since the French had not yet taken formal possession of the region) had announced a disturbing new regulation. American ships sailing the Mississippi River had for many years been accustomed to depositing their cargoes in New Orleans for transfer to oceangoing vessels. The intendant now forbade the practice-even though Spain had guaranteed Americans that right in the Pinckney Treaty of 1795-thus effectively closing the lower Mississippi to American shippers.
Westerners demanded that the federal government do something to reopen the river. The president faced a dilemma. If he yielded to the frontier clamor and tried to change the po icy by force, he would run the risk of a major war
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA
• 199 WEST POINT
Creating a professional military was an important task for the leaders of the early republic. Without an army, they realized, it would be diffi cult for the United States to win respect in the world. The establishment in 1802 of the United States Military Academy at West Point (whose parade ground is pictured here) was, therefore, an important event in the early history of the republic. (© West Point Museum Collections, United States Military Academy) with France. If he ignored the westerners' demands, he might lose political support. But Jefferson saw another solution. He instructed Robert Livingston, the American ambassador in Paris, to negotiate the purchase of New Orleans. Livingston, on his own authority, proposed that the French sell the United States the vast western part of Louisiana as well.
In the meantime, Jefferson persuaded Congress to appropriate funds for an expansion of the army and the construction of a river fleet, and he deliberately gave the impression that American forces might soon descend on New Orleans and that the United States might form an alliance with Great Britain if the problems Napoleon’s	^rance were not res°lved. Perhaps that
Offer	was why Napoleon suddenly decided to ac-
cept Livingston's proposal and offer the
United States the entire Louisiana Territory.
Napoleon had good reasons for the decision. His plans for an American empire had already gone seriously awry. That was partly because a yellow fever epidemic had wiped out much of the French army in the New World. But it was also because the expeditionary force Napoleon sent to take possession of Louisiana had been frozen into a Dutch harbor through the winter of 1802-1803. By the time the harbor thawed in the spring of 1803, Napoleon was preparing for a renewed war in
Europe. He would not, he realized, have the resources now to secure an American empire.
The Louisiana Purchase
Faced with Napoleon’s startling proposal, Livingston and James Monroe, whom Jefferson had sent to Paris to assist in the negotiations, had to decide first whether they should even consider making a treaty for the purchase of the entire Louisiana Territory, since they had not been authorized by their government to do so. But fearful that Napoleon might withdraw the offer, they decided to proceed without further instructions from home. After some haggling over the price, Livingston and Monroe signed the agreement on April 30, 1803.
By the terms of the treaty, the United States was to pay a total of 80 million francs ($15 million) to the French government. The United States was also to grant certain exclusive commercial privileges to France in the port of New Orleans and was to incorporate the residents of Louisiana into the Union with the same rights and privileges as other citizens. The boundaries of the purchase were not clearly defined; the treaty simply specified that Louisiana would occupy the "same extent” as it had when France and Spain had owned it.
200 • CHAPTER 7
BRITISH t □ T
Louisiana Purchase, 1803 —«	Lewis & Clark, 1804-1806
Zebulon Pike, 1805-1807 OPl Native Tribe
EXPLORING THE LOUISIANA PURCHASE, 1804-1807
When Jefferson purchased the Louisiana Territory from France in 1803, he doubled the size of the nation. But few Americans knew what they had bought. The Lewis and Clark expedition set out in 1804 to investigate the new territories, and this map shows their route, along with that of another inveterate explorer, Zebulon Pike, Note the vast distances the two parties covered (including, in both cases, a great deal of land outside the Louisiana Purchase). Note, too, how much of this enormous territory lay outside the orbit of even these ambitious explorations. * How did the American public react to the addition of these new territories?
In Washington, the president was both pleased and embarrassed when he received the treaty. He was pleased with the terms of the bargain but uncertain whether the United States had authority to accept it, since he had always insisted that the federal government could rightfully exercise only those powers explicitly assigned to it. Nowhere did the Constitution say anything about the acquisition of new territory. But Jefferson’s advisers persuaded him that his treaty-making power under the Constitution would justify the purchase of Louisiana. The president finally agreed, trusting, as he said, "that the good sense of our country will correct the evil of loose construction when it shall produce ill effects.” The Republican Congress promptly approved the treaty and appropriated
Jefferson’s
Quandary
money to implement its provisions. Finally, late in 1803, the French assumed formal control of Louisiana from Spain just long enough to turn the territory over to General James Wilkinson, the commissioner of the United States.
The government organized the Louisiana Territory much as it had organized the Northwest Territory, with the assumption that its various territories would eventually become states. The first of these was admitted to the Union as the state of Louisiana in 1812.
Lewis and Clark Explore the West
Meanwhile, several ambitious explorations were revealing the geography of the far-flung new territory to white Americans,
THE EXPLORATIONS OF LEWIS AND CLARK
This map was drawn by William Clark while on his famous journey with Meriwether Lewis through the territory the United States had acquired in the Louisiana Purchase—and beyond. It shows the portages around the "Great Falls" of the Columbia River. (© The Granger Collection, New York) few of whom had ever ventured much beyond the Mississippi River. In 1803, even before Napoleon’s offer to sell Louisiana, Jefferson helped plan an expedition that was to cross the continent to the Pacific Ocean, gather geographic facts, and investigate prospects for trade with the Indians. He named as its leader his private secretary and Virginia neighbor, the thirty-three-year-old Meriwether Lewis, a veteran of Indian wars skilled in the ways of the wilderness. Lewis chose as a colleague the twenty-nine-year-old William Clark, who-like George Rogers Clark, his older brother-was an experienced frontiersman and Indian fighter. In the spring of 1804, Lewis and Clark, with a company of four dozen men, started up the Missouri River from St. Louis. With a Shoshone woman, Sacajawea, as their guide, they eventually crossed the Rocky Mountains, descended the Snake and Columbia Rivers, and in the late autumn of 1805 camped on the Pacific coast. In September 1806, they were back in St. Louis with elaborate records of the geography and the Indian civilizations they had observed along the way, and a lengthy diary recounting their experiences.
While Lewis and Clark were still on their journey, Jefferson dispatched other explorers to other parts of the Louisiana Territory. Lieutenant Zebulon Montgomery Pike, twenty-six
Zebulon Pik Years old, led an expedition in the fall of ulon ike 18Q5 from St L0Uis into the upper
Mississippi Valley. In the summer of 1806, he set out again up the valley of the Arkansas River and into what later became Colorado, where he encountered (but failed in his attempt to climb) the peak that now bears his name. His account of his western travels created an enduring (and inaccurate) impression among many Americans in the East that the land between the Missouri River and the Rockies was an uninhabitable, uncultivable desert.
The Burr Conspiracy
Jefferson’s triumphant reelection in 1804 suggested that most of the nation approved the new territorial acquisition. But some New England Federalists raged against it. They realized that the more the West grew and the more new
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA * 201
states joined the Union, the less power the Federalists and Essex Junto r^eir re&ion woul^ retain. In Massachusetts, a group of the most extreme Federalists, known as the "Essex Junto,” concluded that the only recourse for New England was to secede from the Union and form a separate "Northern Confederacy.” If this confederacy was to have any hope for lasting success, the Federalists believed, it would have to include New York and New Jersey as well. But the leading Federalist in New York, Alexander Hamilton, refused to support the secessionist scheme. "Dismemberment of our empire,” he wrote, "will be a clear sacrifice of great positive advantages without any counterbalancing good, administering no relief to our real disease, which is democracy.”
Federalists in New York then turned to Hamilton’s greatest political rival: Vice President Aaron Burr. He was a politician without prospects in his own party. Jefferson had never for-
T,	given him for the 1800 election deadlock.
Burr	Burr accepted a Federalist proposal that he
become their candidate for governor of
New York in 1804, and there were rumors (unsupported by any evidence) that he had also agreed to support the Federalist plans for secession. Hamilton accused Burr of plotting treason and made numerous private remarks, widely reported in the press, about Burr’s "despicable” character. When Burr lost the New York election, he blamed his defeat on Hamilton’s malevolence. "These things must have an end,” Bun wrote. He challenged Hamilton to a duel.
Dueling had by then already fallen into some disrepute in
America, but many people still considered it a legitimate institution for settling matters of "honor.” Hamilton feared that refusing Burr’s challenge would brand him a coward. And so, on a July morning in 1804, the two men met at Weehawken, New Jersey. Hamilton was mortally wounded; he died the next day.
The resourceful and charismatic Burr was now a political outcast who had to flee New York to avoid an indictment for murder. But he found new outlets for his ambitions in the West. Even before the duel, he had begun corresponding with prominent white settlers in the Southwest, especially with General James Wilkinson, now governor of the Louisiana Territory. Burr and Wilkinson hoped to lead an expedition that would capture Mexico from the Spanish. "Mexico glitters in all our eyes,” Burr wrote; "the word is all we wait for.” But there were also rumors that they wanted to separate the Southwest from the United States and create a western empire that Burr would rule. There is little evidence to support them.
Whether the rumors were true or not, many of Burr’s opponents-including, ultimately, Jefferson himself-chose to believe them. When Burr led a group of armed followers down the Ohio River by boat in 1806, disturbing reports flowed into Washington. The most alarming was from Wilkinson. He had suddenly turned against Burr and now informed the president that treason was afoot and that an attack on New Orleans was imminent. Jefferson ordered Burr and his men arrested as traitors. Burr was brought to Richmond for trial. Determined to win a conviction, Jefferson carefully managed the government’s
202 ♦ CHAPTER 7
NEW ORLEANS IN 1803
Because of its location near the mouth of the Mississippi River, New Orleans was the principal port of western North America in the early nineteenth century. Through it, western farmers shipped their produce to markets in the East and Europe. This 1803 painting celebrates the American acquisition of the city from France as part of the Louisiana Purchase. (© Chicago History Museum, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library)
case from Washington. But Chief Justice Marshall, presiding over the trial on circuit duty, limited the evidence the government could present and defined the charge in such a way that the jury had little choice but to acquit Burr.
The Burr ''conspiracy’ was in part the story of a single man’s soaring ambitions and flamboyant personality. But it was also a symbol of the larger perils still facing the new nation. With a central government that remained deliberately weak, with vast tracts of land only nominally controlled by the United States, with ambitious political leaders willing, if necessary, to circumvent normal channels in their search for power, the legitimacy of the federal government, and indeed the existence of the United States as a stable and united nation, remained to be fully established.
EXPANSION AND WAR
Two very different conflicts were taking shape in the later years of Thomas Jefferson’s presidency that would, together, draw the United States into a difficult and frustrating war. One was the continuing tension in Europe, which in 1803 escalated
The
Napoleonic
Wars
once again into a full-scale conflict (the Napoleonic Wars). As the fighting escalated, both the British and the French took steps to prevent the United States from trading with (and thus assisting) the other.
The other conflict was in North America, a result of the ceaseless westward expansion of white settlement, which was now stretching to the Mississippi River and beyond, colliding again with Native American populations committed to protecting their lands and their trade from intruders. In both the North and the South, the threatened tribes mobilized to resist white encroachments. They began as well to forge connections with British forces in Canada and Spanish forces in Florida. The Indian conflict on land therefore became intertwined with the European conflict on the seas and ultimately helped cause the War of 1812, an unpopular conflict with ambiguous results.
Conflict on the Seas
The early nineteenth century saw a dramatic expansion of American shipping in the Atlantic. Britain retained significant
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA
• 203 naval superiority, but the British merchant marine was preoccupied with commerce in Europe and Asia and devoted little energy to trade with America. Thus the United States stepped effectively into the void and developed one of the most important merchant marines in the world, which soon controlled a large proportion of the trade between Europe and the West Indies.
In 1805, at the Battle of Trafalgar, a British fleet virtually destroyed what was left of the French navy. Because France could no longer challenge the British at sea, Napoleon now chose to pressure England through economic rather than naval means. He announced the creation of what he called the "Continental System.” It was designed to close the European continent to British trade. The British government replied to Napoleon's decrees by establishing-through a series of "orders in council”-a blockade of the European coast. It required that any goods being shipped to Napoleon’s Europe be carried either in British vessels or in neutral vessels stopping at British ports-precisely what Napoleon’s policies forbade.
American ships were caught between Napoleon’s decrees and Britain’s orders in council. If they sailed directly for the European continent, they risked being captured by the British navy; if they sailed by way of a British port, they risked seizure by the French. Both of the warring powers were violating America’s rights as a neutral nation. But most
America’s Americans considered the British, with Predicament their greater sea power, the worse offender. British ships pounced on Yankee merchantmen all over the ocean. Particularly infuriating to Americans, British vessels stopped United States ships on the high seas and seized sailors off the decks, making them
victims of "impressment.”
Impressment
The British navy-with its floggings, low pay, and terrible shipboard conditions-was known as a "floating hell” to its sailors. Few volunteered. Most had to be "impressed” (forced) into the service. At every opportunity they deserted. By 1807, many of these deserters had joined the American merchant marine or the American navy. To check this loss of vital manpower, the British claimed the right to stop and search American merchant ships (although at first not naval vessels) and reimpress deserters. They did not claim the right to take native-born Americans, but they did claim the right to seize naturalized Americans born on British soil. In practice, the British navy often made no such distinctions, impressing British deserters and native-born Americans alike into service.
In the summer of 1807, the British went to more provocative extremes in an incident involving a vessel of the American navy. Sailing from Norfolk, with several alleged deserters from the British navy among the crew, the American naval frigate Chesapeake encountered the British ship Leopard. When the American commander, James Barron, refused to allow
the British to search the Chesapeake, the Leopard opened fire.
Chesapeake-
Leopard
Incident
IMPORTANT
AND
LUMINOUS COMMUNICATION
ON THE
SUBJECT OF THE
IMPRESSMENT OF AMERICAN AND FOREIGN
SEMPEJV
AND OTHER PERSONS.
IT has become manifest to every attentive observer, that the early and continued aggressions of Great Britain on our persons, our property, and our rights, imperiously demand a firm stand—an effectual, though calm system of measures of ar~ restation. For this purpose, it is our duty to make ourselves completely masters of the great truths and arguments by which our rights have been elucidated, supported and maintained.
On the 17th of January, 1806, the President of the United States communicated to Congress an extract from a dispatch of James Madison Esq. our secretary of state, to James Monroe Esq. our minister in London, which contains many facts highly important, and observations and arguments perfectly satisfactory and conclusive againstu impressments of seamen and passengers, whether Foreign or American, on board of our vessels/* The republication of that document at this crisis will at once display some of the reasons on which the government has probably declined to sanction the recent draught of a treaty With Great Britain, and will elucidate the ground on which the question of the impressment of persons^ both native and alien, has been rested by our administration.
Extract of a letter from the Secretary of State to James Monroe Esy. dated 5 th January, 1804.
We consider a neutral flag, on the high seas, as a safeguard to those sailing under it. Great Britain, on the contrary, asserts a right to search for, and seize her own subjects ; and un-
RESIST1NG THE IMPRESSMENT OF SAILORS
On January 5,1804, Secretary of State James Madison wrote this public letter to James Monroe on the unlawful impressment of American sailors by the British Royal Navy. The practice of boarding US ships and taking away sailors deemed by the British to be deserters from their navy came to a climax with the Chesapeake-Leopard Incident. (© The Granger Collection, New York) Barron had no choice but to surrender, and a boarding party from the Leopard dragged four men off the American frigate.
When news of the Chesapeake-Leopard incident reached the United States, there was great popular clamor for revenge. If Congress had been in session, it might have declared war. But Jefferson and Madison tried to maintain the peace. Jefferson expelled all British warships from American waters to lessen the likelihood of future incidents. Then he sent instructions to his minister in England, James Monroe, to demand that the British government renounce impressment. The British government disavowed the action of the officer responsible for the Chesapeake-Leopard incident and recalled him; it offered compensation for those killed and wounded in the incident;
204 ♦ CHAPTER 7
and it promised to return three of the captured sailors (one of the original four had been hanged). But the British refused to renounce impressment.
"Peaceable Coercion”
In an effort to prevent future incidents that might bring the nation again to the brink of war, Congress enacted a drastic measure known as "the Embargo.” It became one of the most controversial political issues of its time. The Embargo prohib-
The Embargo ited American ships horn leaving the United States for any foreign port anywhere in the world. The law was widely evaded, but it was effective enough to create a serious depression through most of the nation. Hardest hit were the merchants and shipowners
of the Northeast, most of them Federalists.
The election of 1808 came in the midst of the Embargo-(1807)
induced depression. James Madison, Jefferson’s secretary of state
Non-Intercourse
Act
and political ally, won the presidency. But the Embargo was clearly a growing political liability, and Jefferson decided to back down. A few days before leaving office, he approved a bill ending his experiment with what he called "peaceable coercion.”
To replace the Embargo, Congress passed the Non-Intercourse Act just before Madison took office. The new law reopened trade with all nations but Great Britain and France. A year later, in 1810, Congress allowed the Non-
Intercourse Act to expire and replaced it with Macon’s Bill No. 2, which conditionally reopened free commercial relations with Britain and France. Napoleon announced that France would no longer interfere with American shipping, and Madison announced that an embargo against Great Britain alone would automatically go into effect early in 1811 unless Britain renounced its restrictions on American shipping. The British government repealed its blockade of Europe. But the reneal came too late to orevent war.
STRUGGLING WITH THE EMBARGO
This cartoon lampoons the U.S. Embargo against Britain in 1807 a decision that crest d k a common nickname for a snapping turtle) is “embargo" spelled backward. It shows a struggling merchant wrestling with esu ts o th T "“T"	Pe°P'e	*
be,ng drawn mto the wars between Britain and France. But the Embargo, which continued until 1812 not onlv hurt the A	9°' " W3S an e,fort t0 Prevenl ,hc United States from
Granger Collection, New York)	1812’ n°‘ °nl>' hur<the Ame"ca" economy but also helped draw the nation into the War of 1812. IS The
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA
• 205 The "Indian Problem”
and the British
The 1807 war crisis following the Chesapeake-Leopard incident revived the conflict between Indians and white Americans. Two important (and very different) leaders emerged to oppose one another in the conflict: William Henry
Harrison and Tecumseh.
The Virginia-born Harrison, already a veteran Indian fighter at age twenty-six, became a congressional delegate from the Northwest Territory in 1799. He was a committed advocate of
William
Henry
Harrison
growth and development in the western lands, and he was largely responsible for the passage in 1800 of the so-called Harrison Land Law, which enabled white settlers to acquire farms from the public domain on much easier terms than before.
In 1801, Jefferson appointed Harrison governor of the Indiana Territory to administer the president’s proposed solution to the "Indian problem.” Jefferson offered the Native Americans a choice: they could convert themselves into settled farmers and Jefferson’s assimilate-become a part of white society; Offer	or r^ey cou^ migrate to the west of the
Mississippi. In either case, they would have to give up their claims to tribal lands in the Northwest.
BRITISH
CANADA
iault Ste. Marie
DAKOTA
ILLINOIS /Z TERRITORY
r ~	& TRiMichilimacRinac
!	AZ
MICHIGAN MISSISAUGA
Ceded before 1784	_____ Treaty of
	Greenville, 1795
:	Ceded 1784-1799	Treaty of
Ceded 1800-1812	Fort Wayne, 1809
Unceded Indian	Battle
lands, 1812	
Mexico
SEMINOLE
BRITISH
CANADA
	Ceded 1784-1812		Spread of Prophet's influence
	Unceded Indian			Tecumseh's
	lands, 1812	travel routes
&	Battle	r-nrpjx Tribes joining movement
Gulf of Mexico

THE INDIAN RESPONSE TO WHITE ENCROACHMENT
With land cessions and white western migration placing increased pressure on Indian cultures after 1790. news of the Prophet's tSPONSE TO ,. , Michiaan and westward along Lake Superior and the interior of Wisconsin. Following the Battle of Tippecanoe, revival fell on eager ears. It spread especially quickly northward along the shores of Lake Michigan ana wesi a n IT
Tecumseh eclipsed the Prophet as the major leader of Indian resistance,
but his trips south to forge political alliance met with less success.
206 CHAPTER 7
Jefferson considered the assimilation policy a benign alternative to continuing conflict between Indians and white settlers, a conflict he assumed the tribes were destined to lose. But to the tribes, the new policy seemed far from benign, especially given the bludgeonlike efficiency with which Harrison set out to implement it. He played one tribe against another and used threats, bribes, trickery, and whatever other tactics he felt would help him conclude treaties. In the first decade of the nineteenth century, the number of western Americans who had settled east of the Appalachians had grown to more than 500,000-a population far larger than that of the Native Americans. It was becoming almost inevitable, as a result, that the tribes would face ever-growing pressure to move out of the way of the rapidly growing white settlements.
By 1807, the United States had extracted from reluctant tribal leaders treaty rights to eastern Michigan, southern Indiana, and most of Illinois. Meanwhile, in the Southwest, white Americans were taking millions of acres from other tribes in Georgia, Tennessee, and Mississippi. The Indians wanted to resist, but the separate tribes were helpless by themselves against the power of the United States. They might have accepted their fate passively but for the emergence of two new factors.
One factor was the policy of the British authorities in Canada. After the Chesapeake-Leopard incident and the surge of anti-British feeling throughout the United States, the British colonial authorities began to expect an American invasion of Canada and took measures for their own defense. Among those measures were efforts to renew friendship with the Indians and provide them with increased supplies.
Tecumseh and the Prophet
The second, and more important, factor intensifying the border conflict was the rise of two remarkable Native American leaders,
who together helped create an age of religious fervor and prophecy. One was Tenskwatawa, a charismatic religious leader and orator known as "the Prophet.” He had experienced a mystical
, awakening in the process of recovering from THMessage T S alcoholism. Having freed himself from what he considered the evil effects of white culture, he began to speak to his people of the superior virtues of Indian civilization and the sinfulness and corruption of the white world. In the process, he inspired a religious revival that spread through numerous tribes and helped unite them. Like Neolin before him, and like his contemporary to the east, Handsome Lake, Tenskwatawa demonstrated the power of religious leaders to mobilize Indians behind political and military objectives. The Prophets headquarters at the confluence of Tippecanoe Creek and the Wabash River (known as Prophetstown) became a sacred place for people of many tribes and attracted thousands of Indians from throughout the Midwest. Out of their common religious experiences, they began to consider joint political and military efforts as well. Tenskwatawa advocated an Indian society entirely separate from that of white Americans and a culture rooted in tribal tradition. The effort to trade with the Anglos and to borrow from their culture would, he argued, lead to the death of Indian ways.
Tecumseh-the chief of the Shawnees called by his tribe "the Shooting Star”-was in many ways even more militant than his brother. 'Where today are the Pequot?” he thundered. "Where are . . . the other powerful tribes of our people? They have vanished before the avarice and oppression of the white man.” And he warned of his tribe's extermination if they did not take ac-
tion against the white Americans moving into their lands. Tecumseh understood, as few other Indian leaders had, that
only through united action could the tribes hope to resist the advance of white civilization. Beginning in 1809, after tribes in Indiana had ceded vast lands to the United States, he set out to
TECUMSEH
Tecumseh’s efforts to unite the tribes of the Mississippi Valley against further white encroachments on their lands led him ultimately into an alliance with the British after the Battle of Tippecanoe in 1811. In the War of 1812, he was commissioned a brigadier general by the British and fought against the United States in the Battle of the Thames. (© Parks Canada Agency - Fort Malden NHS) THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA * 207
JAMES AND DOLLEY MADISON
James Madison may have been the most brilliant of the early leaders of the republic, but he was also one of the most serious and humorless, as this grim portrait suggests. His wife (born Dolley Payne in North Carolina and raised a Quaker in Virginia) was twenty-six when she married the forty-three-year-old Madison in 1794. Her charm and social grace made her one of her husband's greatest political assets. She acted as hostess for Thomas Jefferson, a widower, while her husband was secretary of state. And she presided over a lively social life during her eight years in the White House as First Lady. (Both © Collection of the New-York Historical Society, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library) unite all the Indians of the Mississippi Valley, north and south. Tecumseh’s Together, he promised, they would halt Strategy white expansion, recover the whole Northwest, and make the Ohio River the boundary between the United States and the Indian country.
He maintained that Harrison and others, by negotiating treaties with individual tribes, had obtained no real title to land. The land belonged to all the tribes; none of them could rightfully cede any of it without the consent of the others.
In 1811, Tecumseh left Prophetstown and traveled down the Mississippi to visit the tribes of the South, hoping to persuade them to join the alliance. During his absence, Harrison camped near Prophetstown with 1,000 soldiers. On November 7, 1811, he provoked a battle. The white forces suffered losses as heavy as those of the natives, but Harrison drove off the Indians and burned the town. The Battle of Tippecanoe (named for the creek near the fighting) disillusioned many of the
Prophet’s followers, who had believed that his magic would protect them. Tecumseh returned to find the confederacy in
Battle of Tippecanoe
disarray. But there were still many warriors eager for combat, and by the spring of 1812 they were raiding white settlements and terrifying white settlers.
The bloodshed along the western borders was largely a result of the Indians’ own initiative, but Britain’s agents in Canada had encouraged and helped supply the uprising. To Harrison and most white residents of the regions, there seemed only one way to make the West safe for Americans: drive the British out of Canada and annex that province to the United States.
Florida and War Fever
While white "frontiersmen” in the North demanded the conquest of Canada, those in the South wanted the United States to acquire Spanish Florida, a territory that included the present state of Florida and the southern areas of what are now Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana. The territory was a continuing threat to whites in the southern United States. Slaves escaped across the Florida border; Indians launched frequent raids north into white settlements from Florida. But white southerners also coveted Florida because through it ran rivers that could provide residents of the Southwest with access to valuable ports on the Gulf of Mexico.
In 1810, American settlers in West Florida (an area that is part of Mississippi and Louisiana today) seized the Spanish fort
208 * CHAPTER 7
at Baton Rouge and asked the federal government to annex the captured territory to the United States. President Madison happily agreed and then began planning to get the rest of Florida, too. The desire for Florida became yet another motivation for war with Britain. Spain was Britain’s ally, and a war with Britain might provide a pretext for taking Spanish territory.
By 1812, war fever was growing on both the northern and southern borders of the United States. In the congressional elections of 1810, voters from these regions elected a large number of representatives of both parties eager for war with Britain. They became known as the "war hawks.” Some of them were ardent nationalists fired by passion for territorial expansion-among them two men who would play a great role War Hawks in nationa^ politics for much of the next four decades: Henry Clay of Kentucky and
John C. Calhoun of South Carolina. Others were men impassioned in their defense of Republican values. Together, they formed a powerful coalition in favor of war.
Clay became Speaker of the House in 1811, and he filled committees with those who shared his eagerness for war. He appointed Calhoun to the crucial Committee on Foreign Affairs, and both men began agitating for the conquest of Canada. Madison still hoped for peace. But he shared the concerns of other Republicans about the dangers to American trade, and he was losing control of Congress. On June 18, 1812, he gave in to the pressure and approved a declaration of war against Britain.
THE WAR OF 1812
Preoccupied with their struggle against Napoleon in Europe, the British were not eager for a conflict with the United States. Even after the Americans declared war, Britain largely ignored them for a time. But in the fall of 1812, Napoleon launched a catastrophic campaign against Russia that left his army in disarray and his power in Europe diminished. By late 1813, with the French Empire on its way to final defeat, Britain was able to turn its military attention to America.
Battles with the Tribes
Americans entered the War of 1812 with great enthusiasm, but events on the battlefield soon cooled their ardor. In the summer of 1812, American forces invaded Canada through Detroit. They soon had to retreat back to Detroit and in August surrendered the fort there. Other invasion efforts also failed. In the meantime, Fort Dearborn (Chicago) fell before an Indian attack.
Things went only slightly better for the United States on the seas. At first, American frigates won some spectacular victories over British warships, and American privateers destroyed or captured many British merchant ships, occasionally Early Defeats braving the coastal waters of the British Isles themselves and burning vessels within sight of the shore. But by 1813, the British navy-now less
preoccupied with Napoleon-was counterattacking effectively, driving the American frigates to cover and imposing a block-ade on the United States.
The United States did, however, achieve significant early military successes on the Great Lakes. First, the Americans took command of Lake Ontario, which permitted them to raid and burn York (now Toronto), the capital of Canada. American forces then seized control of Lake Erie, mainly through the Put-in-Bay work of the youthful Oliver Hazard Perry, who engaged and dispersed a British fleet at Put-in-Bay on September 10, 1813. This made possible another invasion of Canada by way of Detroit, which Americans could now reach easily by water. William Henry Harrison, the American commander in the West, pushed up the Thames River into upper Canada and, on October 5, 1813, won a victory notable for the death of Tecumseh, who was serving as a brigadier general in the British army. The Battle of the Thames weakened and disheartened the Native Americans of the Northwest and greatly diminished their ability to defend their
claims to the region.
In the meantime, another white military leader was striking an even harder blow at the tribes of the Southwest. The Creeks, whom Tecumseh had aroused on a visit to the South and whom the Spanish had supplied with weapons, had been attacking white settlers near the Florida border. Andrew Jackson, a wealthy Tennessee planter and a general in the state militia, temporarily abandoned plans for an invasion of Florida and set off in pursuit of them. On March 27, 1814, in the Battle of Horseshoe Bend, Jackson’s men took terrible revenge on the Indians-slaughtering women and children along with warriors-and broke the resistance of the Creeks. The tribe agreed to cede most of its lands to the United States and retreated westward, farther into the interior. The battle also won Jackson a commission as a major general in the United States Army. In that capacity he led his men farther south into Florida and, on November 7, 1814, seized the Spanish fort at Pensacola.
Battles with the British
The victories over the tribes were not enough for the United States to win the war. After the surrender of Napoleon in 1814,
The British England prepared to invade the United
Invasion States. A British armada sailed up the Patuxent River from Chesapeake Bay and landed an army that marched a short distance overland to Bladensburg, on the outskirts of Washington, where it dispersed a poorly trained force of American militiamen. On August 24, 1814, the British troops entered Washington and set fire to several public buildings, including the White House, in retaliation for the earlier American burning of the Canadian capital at York. This was the low point of American fortunes in
the war.
Leaving Washington in partial ruins, the British army proceeded up the bay toward Baltimore. But Baltimore harbor, guarded by Fort McHenry, was prepared. To block the
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA * 209
ATLANTI C OCEAN
the Americans during the War of 1812. It shows all the theaters of the war, from New Orleans to southern Lakes, and the fighting around Washington and Baltimore. Note how in all these theaters there are about the same
SPANISH MEXICO
—	U.S. forces
	British forces
....	British blockade
4	U.S. victory
4	British victory
	Indian victory
	Territory ceded or annexed
	by U.S., 1810-1819
THE WAR OF 1812
This map illustrates the military maneuvers of the British and Canada, the extended land and water battle along the Canadian border and in the Great number of British and American victories. * What finally brought this inconclusive war to an end?
approaching fleet, the American garrison had sunk several ships to clog the entry to the harbor, thus forcing the British
to bombard the fort from a distance.
Through the night of September 13, Francis Scott Key, a
Washington lawyer who was on board one of the British ships trying to secure the release of an American prisoner, watched the bombardment. The next morning, "by the dawn's early light,” he could see the flag on the fort still flying; he recorded his pride in the moment by scribbling a poem—"The Star-Spangled Banner”-on the back of an envelope. The British withdrew from Baltimore, and Key’s words were soon set to
the tune of an old English drinking song. In 1931, "The Star-Spangled Banner” became the official national anthem.
Meanwhile, American forces repelled another British invasion in northern New York at the Battle of Plattsburgh, on September 11, 1814, which turned back a much larger British naval and land force and secured the northern border of the
Battle of United States. In the South, a formidable New Orleans array °f battle-hardened British veterans, fresh from the campaign against the French in Spain, landed below New Orleans and prepared to advance north up the Mississippi. Awaiting the British was Andrew
210 * CHAPTER 7
Jackson with a motley collection of Tennesseans, Kentuckians, Creoles, blacks, pirates, and regular army troops behind earthen fortifications. On January 8, 1815, the British advanced, but their exposed forces were no match for Jackson’s well-protected men. After the Americans had repulsed several waves of attackers, the British finally retreated, leaving behind 700 dead (including their commander, Sir Edward Pakenham), 1,400 wounded, and 500 prisoners. Jackson’s losses were 8 killed and 13 wounded. Only later did news reach North America that the United States and Britain had signed a peace treaty several weeks before the Battle of New Orleans.
The Revolt of New England
With a few notable exceptions, such as the Battles of Put-in-Bay and New Orleans, the military operations of the United States between 1812 and 1815 consisted of a series of humiliating failures. As a result, the American government faced increasing popular opposition as the contest dragged on. In New England, opposition both to the war and to the Republican government that was waging it was so extreme that some Federalists celebrated British victories. In Congress, in the meantime, the Republicans had persistent trouble with the Federalist opposition, led by a young congressman from New Hampshire, Daniel Webster, who missed no opportunity to embarrass the administration.
By now the Federalists were a minority in the country as a whole, but they were still the majority party in New England. Some of them began to dream again of creating a separate nation in that region, which they could dominate and in which they could escape what they saw as the tyranny of slaveholders and backwoodsmen. Talk of secession revived and reached a climax in the winter of 1814-1815.
outnumbered by
Hartford
Convention
On December 15, 1814, delegates from the New England states met in Hartford, Connecticut, to discuss their grievances. Those who favored secession at the Hartford Convention were a comparatively moderate majority. But while the convention’s report only hinted at secession, it reasserted the right of nullification and proposed seven amend-
ments to the Constitution (presumably as the condition of New England’s remaining in the Union)-amendments designed to protect New England from the growing influence of the South and the West.
Because the war was going badly and the government was becoming desperate, the New Englanders assumed that the Republicans would have to agree to their demands. Soon after the convention adjourned, however, the news of Jackson’s smashing victory at New Orleans reached the cities of the Northeast. A day or two later, reports arrived from abroad of a negotiated peace. In the euphoria of this apparent triumph, the Hartford Convention and the Federalists came to seem futile, irrelevant, even treasonable. The failure of the secession effort was a virtual death blow to the Federalist Party.
The Peace Settlement
Peace talks between the United States and Britain had begun even before fighting in the War of 1812 began. John Quincy Adams, Elenry Clay, and Albert Gallatin led the American delegation.
In the negotiations, the Americans gave up their demand for a British renunciation of impressment and for the cession of Canada to the United States. The British abandoned their call for
Treaty of Ghent
THE BOMBARDMENT OF FORT MCHENRY
The British bombardment of Fort McHenry in Baltimore harbor in September 1814 was of modest importance to the outcome of the War of 1812. It is remembered as the occasion for Francis Scott Key to write his poem "The Star-Spangled Banner," which recorded his sentiments at seeing an American flag still flying over the fort "by the dawn’s early light.” (The Library of Congress)
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA * 251
The SiaiTFord Cmivciiiion Leap no Leap
ATTACKING THE FEDERALISTS A
Republican cartoonist derided the secession efforts of New England Federalists at the Hartford Convention in this cartoon. It portrays timid men representing Massachusetts, Connecticut, and Rhode Island preparing to leap into the arms of George III. (The Library of Congress) the creation of an Indian buffer state in the Northwest. The negotiators referred other disputes to arbitration. Hastily drawn up, a treaty was signed on Christmas Eve 1814. It was named the Treaty of Ghent after the Dutch city in which it was signed.
Other settlements followed the Treaty of Ghent and contributed to a long-term improvement in Anglo-American rela-
„	„	tions. A commercial treaty in 1815 gave
Rush-Bagot a	k k	j r 1	. k
Agreement Americans the right to trade freely with
England and much of the British Empire. The Rush-Bagot agreement of 1817 provided for mutual disarmament on the Great Lakes; eventually (although not until 1872) the Canadian-American boundary became the longest "unguarded frontier'’ in the world.
LOOKING BACK
Thomas Jefferson called his election to the presidency the "Revolution of 1800,” and his supporters believed that his victory would bring a dramatic change in the character of the nation-a retreat from Hamilton’s dreams of a powerful, developing nation with great stature in the world; a return to an
For the other parties to the War of 1812, the Indian tribes east of the Mississippi, the Treaty of Ghent was of no lasting value. It required the United States to restore to the tribes lands seized by white Americans in the fighting, but those provisions were never enforced. Ultimately, the war was another disastrous blow to the capacity of Native Americans to resist white expansion. Tecumseh, their most important leader, was dead. The British, their most important allies, were gone from the Northwest. The alliance that Tecumseh and the Prophet had forged was in disarray. And the end of the war spurred a great new drive by white settlers deeper into the West, into land the Indians were less than ever able to defend.
ideal of a simple agrarian republic happily isolated from the corruption and intrigue of Europe.
But American society was changing rapidly in the early nineteenth century, making it virtually impossible for the Jeffersonian dream to prevail. The nation’s population was
212 CHAPTER 7
expanding and diversifying. Its cities were growing, and its commercial life was becoming ever more important. In 1803, Jefferson himself made one of the most important contributions to the growth of the United States: the Louisiana Purchase, which dramatically expanded the physical boundaries of the nationand which began extending white settlement deeper into the continent. In the process, it greatly widened the battles between Europeans and Native Americans.
The growing national pride and commercial ambitions of the United States gradually created another serious conflict
Key Terms/People/Places/Events
Aaron Burr 201 Cane Ridge 185 Deism 184 Eli Whitney 189 Handsome Lake 206 Hartford Convention 210 Impressment 203
RECALL AND REFLECT
1.	What was the impact of the Second Great Awakening on women, African Americans, and Native Americans?
2.	What was the long-term significance of the Marbury v. Madison ruling?
3.	How did Americans respond to the Louisiana Purchase?
John Marshall 196 Judith Sargent Murray 182 Marbury v. Madison 195 Mercy Otis Warren 184 Neolin 188
Noah Webster 184 Robert Fulton 190
with Great Britain: the War of 1812, a war that went badly for the Americans on the whole, but that was settled finally in 1814 on terms at least mildly favorable to the United States. By then, the bitter party rivalries that had characterized the first years of the republic had to some degree subsided, and the nation was poised to enter what became known as the "era of good feelings.” It was to be an era in which good feelings did not last for very long.
Second Great Awakening 185
Tecumseh 206
The Embargo 204
The Prophet (Tenskwatawa) 206
Toussaint L'Ouverture 198
Washington Irving 184
William Henry Harrison 208
4.	What foreign entanglements and questions of foreign policy did Jefferson have to deal with during his presidency? How did these issues affect his political philosophy?
5.	What were the consequences of the War of 1812?
THE JEFFERSONIAN ERA
• 213 SIGNIFICANT EVENTS
1790		4b „		1807
Samuel Slater builds textile mill, first modern factory in America, in Pawtucket, Rhode Island •	1793	1808	A	The Embargo begins
	Eli Whitney invents cotton gin	Madison elected president		
1800 •			A	1809
United States capital moves to Washington, D.C. Gabriel Prosser’s plans for slave rebellion foiled	• 1801-1805	9	1801	1810	•	Embargo Act repealed Tecumseh establishes tribal confederacy
	Second Great Awakening begins John Marshall appointed chief justice	Macon’s Bill No. 2 reopens trade with Britain and France United States declares war on	A	1812
Conflict with Tripoli		Great Britain (June 18)		Madison reelected president
• 1804	* Thomas Jefferson reelected president	1803	1814	A	
	Louisiana Territory purchased from French Supreme Court establishes power of judicial review in Marbury v. Madison	Hartford Convention meets Treaty of Ghent signed	A	1815
			w	Jackson wins Battle of New Orleans
	1804-1805			
•	Lewis and Clark, and Zebulon			
Pike, explore Louisiana Territory
VARIETIES OF AMERICAN NATIONALISM
LOOKING AHEAD
1. How did the economic developments and territorial expansion of this era affect American nationalism?
2. What was the "era of good feelings," and why was it given that name?
3. How did the Marshall Court seek to establish a strong national government?
CELEBRATING THE NATION
Celebrations of Independence Day, like this one in New York City, became major festive events throughout the United States in the early nineteenth century, a sign of rising American Nationalism, (r) North Wind Picture Archives./Alamyj 
SETTING THE STAGE
LIKE A “FIRE BELL IN THE NIGHT,"
as Thomas Jefferson put it, the issue of slavery arose after the War of 1812 to threaten the unity of the nation. The debate began when the territory of Missouri applied for admission to the Union, raising the question of whether it would be a free or a slaveholding state. But the larger issue, one that would arise again and again to plague the republic, was whether the vast new western regions of the United States would ultimately move into the orbit of the North or the South. The Missouri crisis, which Congress settled by compromise in 1820, was significant at the time not only because it was a sign of the sectional crises to come but also because it stood in such sharp contrast to the rising American nationalism of the years following the war. Whatever forces might be working to pull the nation apart, stronger ones were acting for the moment to draw it together. A set of widely (although never universally) shared sentiments and ideals worked to bind the nation together: the memory of the Revolution, the veneration of the Constitution and its framers, the belief that America had a special destiny in the world.
On July 4, 1826—the fiftieth anniversary of the adoption of the Declaration of Independence—an event occurred that to many Americans seemed to confirm that the United States was a nation specially chosen by God. On that remarkable day, two of the greatest of the country’s founders and former presidents—Thomas Jefferson, author of the Declaration, and John Adams, whom Jefferson had called "its ablest advocate and defender"—died within hours of each other. Jefferson’s last words, those at his bedside reported, were "Is it the Fourth?" And Adams comforted those around him moments before his death by saying, ’Thomas Jefferson still survives."
BUILDING A NATIONAL MARKET
The end of the War of 1812 allowed the United States to resume the economic growth and territorial expansion that had characterized the first decade of the nineteenth century. A vigorous postwar boom led to a disastrous bust in 1819. Brief though it was, the collapse was evidence that the United States continued to lack some of the basic institutions necessary to sustain long-term growth. In the years to follow, there were strenuous efforts to introduce stability to the expanding economy.
Banking, Currency, ano Protection
The War of 1812 may have stimulated the growth of manufacturing by cutting off imports, but it also produced chaos in shipping and banking, and it exposed dramatically the inadequacy of the
Postwar existing transportation and financial systems. The aftermath of the war, there-Issues	fore, saw the emergence of a series of political issues connected with national
economic development.
The wartime experience underlined the need for another national bank. After the expiration of the first Bank of the United States’s charter in 1811, a large number of state banks had begun operations. They issued vast quantities of bank notes but did not always retain enough reserves of gold or silver to redeem the notes on demand. The notes passed from hand to hand more or less as money, but their actual value depended on the reputation of the bank that issued them. Thus there was a wide variety of notes, of widely differing value, in circulation at the same time. The result was a confusion that made honest business difficult and counterfeiting easy.
Congress dealt with the currency problem by chartering a second Bank of the United States in 1816 It was essentially the same institution Hamilton had founded in 1791 except that it had more capital than its predecessor. The national bank could not forbid state banks to issue currency, but its size and power enabled it to dominate the state banks. It could compel them to issue only sound notes or risk being forced out of business.
Congress also acted to promote the already burgeoning manufacturing sector of the nation’s economy. Manufactured goods had been so scarce during the conflict that, even with comparatively
Second Bank of the United States
215
